Tennessee, session 114, SB0607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1307, is amended by deleting
subsection (a).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1307(b)(1), is amended by
deleting "unlawfully".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1307, is amended by deleting
subsection (e).
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1307, is amended by deleting
subsection (g).
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1313(a), is amended by
deleting "lawfully carries a handgun pursuant to § 39-17-1307(g)" and substituting "is not
prohibited from possessing or carrying a firearm".
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1364, is amended by deleting
"§ 39-17-1307, or".
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1307, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
( )
(1) It is an offense for a juvenile to carry, with the intent to go armed, a
firearm.
(2) A violation of subdivision ( )(1) is a Class A misdemeanor.
SB0607
002121
- 1 -

(3) A firearm that is carried by a juvenile with the intent to go armed in
violation of this subsection ( ) must be confiscated and disposed of in
accordance with § 39-17-1317.
(4) It is an exception to the application of subdivision ( )(1) if the juvenile
is:
(A) In attendance at a hunter safety course or a firearm safety
course;
(B) Engaging in practice in the use of a firearm or target shooting
at an established range or club authorized by the governing body of the
jurisdiction in which the range or club is located or any other area where
the discharge of a firearm is not prohibited;
(C) Engaging in an organized competition involving the use of a
firearm, or participating in or practicing for a performance by an organized
group that is exempt from federal income taxation under § 501(c)(3) of
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)), as amended,
and that uses firearms as part of the performance;
(D) Hunting or trapping pursuant to a valid license issued to the
juvenile pursuant to title 70;
(E) Engaging in the lawful protection of livestock from predatory
animals;
(F) Accompanied by the juvenile's parent or guardian and is being
instructed by the parent or guardian in the use of the firearm carried by
the juvenile;
- 2 - 002121

(G) On real property that is under the control of an adult and has
the permission of that adult and the juvenile's parent or legal guardian to
carry, with the intent to go armed, a firearm;
(H) Traveling to or from an activity described in this subdivision (
)(4) with an unloaded firearm;
(I) At the juvenile's residence and, with permission of the
juvenile's parent or legal guardian, is justified in using physical force or
deadly force; or
(J)
(i) Except as provided in subdivision ( )(4)(J)(ii),
transporting or storing an unloaded firearm in a motor vehicle
while on or utilizing a public or private parking area if:
(a) The juvenile is licensed to drive a motor vehicle
pursuant to title 55, chapter 50, part 3;
(b) The juvenile's motor vehicle is parked in a
location where the motor vehicle is permitted to be; and
(c) The firearm being transported or stored in the
motor vehicle:
(1) Is kept from ordinary observation if the
juvenile is in the motor vehicle; or
(2) Is kept from ordinary observation and
locked within the trunk, glove box, or interior of the
juvenile's motor vehicle or a container securely
affixed to the motor vehicle if the juvenile is not in
the motor vehicle.
- 3 - 002121

(ii) Subdivision ( )(4)(J)(i) does not apply to the parking
area of a public or private school campus, grounds, recreation
area, athletic field, or any other property owned, operated, or while
in use by any board of education, school, college or university
board of trustees, regents, or directors for the administration of a
public or private educational institution, unless the juvenile is
engaged in an activity described in subdivision ( )(4)(C).
(5) As used in this subsection ( ):
(A) "Juvenile" means a person less than eighteen (18) years of
age; and
(B) "Unloaded" means:
(i) The firearm does not have ammunition in the chamber,
cylinder, clip, or magazine; and
(ii) The firearm, and the ammunition for the firearm, are
not carried on the person of a juvenile or are not in such close
proximity to the juvenile that the juvenile could readily gain access
to the firearm and the ammunition and load the firearm.
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1308, is amended by deleting
the language "It is a defense to the application of § 39-17-1307 if the possession or carrying
was:" and substituting "It is a defense to the application of § 39-17-1307(h)(1)(B) if the carrying
was:".
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1308, is amended by deleting
subsection (b).
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1351(b), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting instead:
- 4 - 002121

(b) Except as provided in subsection (r), a resident of this state who is a United
States citizen or lawful permanent resident, as defined by § 55-50-102, may apply to the
department of safety for an enhanced handgun carry permit. If the applicant is at least
eighteen (18) years of age and is not prohibited from possessing a firearm in this state
pursuant to § 39-17-1307(b), 18 U.S.C. § 922(g), or any other state or federal law, and
the applicant otherwise meets all of the requirements of this section, then the
department shall issue a permit to the applicant.
SECTION 11. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1351(x)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "twenty-one (21) years of age" and substituting instead the language
"eighteen (18) years of age".
SECTION 12. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 5 - 002121